Florida, session 2026, HB4101.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Notwithstanding ss. 791.001 and 791.08, Florida
Statutes, the sale and use of fireworks within the Town of
Loxahatchee Groves agricultural residential (AR) zoning district
is prohibited on all days of the year except for the following:
(1) Supervised public displays within the jurisdictional
boundaries of the Town of Loxahatchee Groves where such displays
are handled by a competent operator to be approved by the Palm
Beach County Sheriff's Office and Fire Department, and shall be
of such a character, and so located, discharged, or fired as in
the opinion of the chief of the fire department, after proper
inspection, shall not be hazardous to property or endanger any
person. Application for permits shall be made in writing at
least 15 days in advance of the date of the display. After such
privilege shall have been granted, sales, possession, use, and
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4101-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 4101 2026
distribution of fireworks for such display shall be lawful for
that purpose only. No permit granted hereunder shall be
transferable.
(2) Nothing herein is intended or shall prevent the
importation, purchase, sale, or use of fireworks for
agricultural purposes in s. 791.07, Florida Statutes.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4101-00